Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-357
Joint outlet of two districts; cost of improvements; how allocated.

When two or more districts shall have their outlet or discharge into the same natural watercourse or stream, each district shall be assessed for the cost of such work in the same ratio to such total cost as the discharge of waters of such district bears to the combined discharge of waters of the several districts emptying into such natural watercourse or stream; but no district shall be liable to contribute for any improvement or costs and expenses incurred in improving such natural watercourse or stream above the point of discharge of the waters of such district into the same.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 26, p. 630;

R.S.1913, § 1852;

C.S.1922, § 1799;

C.S.1929, § 31-456;

R.S.1943, § 31-357.

Drainage district cannot be released from private property rights established by judgment by subsequent legislation. Mooney v. Drainage Dist. No. 1 of Richardson County, 134 Neb. 192, 278 N.W. 368 (1938), reversing on rehearing, 133 Neb. 197, 274 N.W. 467 (1937).

Above section is not of such vital importance as to form inducement to passage of remainder of law, and even if invalid, would not excuse a duty enjoined by valid portion. Mooney v. Drainage District No. 1 of Richardson County, 126 Neb. 219, 252 N.W. 910 (1934).